dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
abuklamak/≟
aforozlamak/≟
afsunlamak/≟
afyonlamak/≟
agulamak/≟
akortlamak/≟
akozlamak/≟
anaforlamak/≟
arzulamak/≟
avurtlamak/≟
avuçlamak/≟
azotlamak/≟
aşık oynamak/≟
balonlamak/≟
balyozlamak/≟
baryumlamak/≟
bloklamak/≟
bodoslamak/≟
boklamak/≟
boncuklamak/≟
boyamak/≟
boylamak/≟
boynuzlamak/≟
boyutlamak/≟
bozlamak/≟
boğumlamak/≟
boşamak/≟
boşlamak/≟
bromlamak/≟
budamak/≟
buhurlamak/≟
bulamak/≟
bulgulamak/≟
bulgurlamak/≟
bumlamak/≟
bunamak/≟
burcumak/≟
burgulamak/≟
burumak/≟
burunlamak/≟
buzulamak/≟
buğulamak/≟
BÜMAK/≟⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
bümak/≟
cicozlamak/≟
coplamak/≟
cozurdamak/≟
cumbuldamak/≟
cumburdamak/≟
depolamak/≟
dokumak/≟
dolamak/≟
donamak/≟
doruklamak/≟
doğramak/≟
doğrulamak/≟
durulamak/≟
duyumsamak/≟
ebrulamak/≟
efsunlamak/≟
fokurdamak/≟
fokuslamak/≟
fonlamak/≟
foslamak/≟
fosurdamak/≟
foşurdamak/≟
gadre uğramak/≟
gruplamak/≟
gucurdamak/≟
gurklamak/≟
gurlamak/≟
guruldamak/≟
hamurlamak/≟
havuzlamak/≟
hohlamak/≟
homurdamak/≟
hoplamak/≟
horlamak/≟
hortlamak/≟
hortumlamak/≟
horuldamak/≟
hoşlamak/≟
ispiyonlamak/≟
iyotlamak/≟
kadastrolamak/≟
kalburlamak/≟
kaparozlamak/≟
karbonlamak/≟
kartonlamak/≟
kaskolamak/≟
kataloglamak/≟
klonlamak/≟
klorlamak/≟
kocamak/≟
kodlamak/≟
koklamak/≟
kokozlamak/≟
kollamak/≟
koltuklamak/≟
komak/≟
konuklamak/≟
konumlamak/≟
konuşmamak/≟
konçlamak/≟
korumak/≟
kotlamak/≟
kovlamak/≟
kovumsamak/≟
koçsamak/≟
koşuklamak/≟
koşullamak/≟
kulunlamak/≟
kumlamak/≟
kurgulamak/≟
kurulamak/≟
kurumak/≟
kurşunlamak/≟
kutlamak/≟
kutlulamak/≟
kutsamak/≟
kutulamak/≟
kuzulamak/≟
kuğurdamak/≟
kılavuzlamak/≟
limonlamak/≟
lodoslamak/≟
loğlamak/≟
macunlamak/≟
mahmuzlamak/≟
mantolamak/≟
masal okumak/≟
mazotlamak/≟
mortlamak/≟
moruklamak/≟
mumlamak/≟
muştulamak/≟
nodullamak/≟
notlamak/≟
obrumak/≟
ocumak/≟
oflamak/≟
ohlamak/≟
oklamak/≟
okramak/≟
okumak/≟
okşamak/≟
olumlamak/≟
olumsuzlamak/≟
olurlamak/≟
omuzlamak/≟
onamak/≟
oramak/≟
otamak/≟
otlamak/≟
oylamak/≟
oylumlamak/≟
oynamak/≟
oyulgamak/≟
oyumlamak/≟
ozonlamak/≟
palamutlamak/≟
parpullamak/≟
patozlamak/≟
poflamak/≟
pofurdamak/≟
pohpohlamak/≟
pomak/≟⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
porsumak/≟
potlamak/≟
pozlamak/≟
puflamak/≟
pullamak/≟
pusulamak/≟
raporlamak/≟
repolamak/≟
rujlamak/≟
rötuşlamak/≟
sabuklamak/≟
sabunlamak/≟
sarhoşlamak/≟
sifonlamak/≟
silolamak/≟
sollamak/≟
soluklamak/≟
solumak/≟
somutlamak/≟
sonlamak/≟
sonuçlamak/≟
sorgulamak/≟
sorumak/≟
soyutlamak/≟
soğuklamak/≟
soğumak/≟
stoklamak/≟
sulamak/≟
sumsuklamak/≟
susamak/≟
suçlamak/≟
tahkire uğramak/≟
takozlamak/≟
tamponlamak/≟
tapulamak/≟
tohumlamak/≟
tokurdamak/≟
tomruklamak/≟
tonlamak/≟
toplamak/≟
topuklamak/≟
toslamak/≟
toylamak/≟
tozumak/≟
tunçlamak/≟
turlamak/≟
tutamak/≟⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
tutuklamak/≟
tuzlamak/≟
tuşlamak/≟
ucuzlamak/≟
uflamak/≟
ulamak/≟
ululamak/≟
ulumak/≟
umurlamak/≟
umursamak/≟
unlamak/≟
uygulamak/≟
uylamak/≟
uyuklamak/≟
uyumak/≟
uzamak/≟
uçuklamak/≟
uğramak/≟
uğrulamak/≟
uğuldamak/≟
uğurlamak/≟
uğursamak/≟
vakumlamak/≟
vurgulamak/≟
yavrulamak/≟
yavuklamak/≟
yağmurlamak/≟
yoklamak/≟
yoksamak/≟
yoksunsamak/≟
yokumsamak/≟
yolculamak/≟
yollamak/≟
yordamak/≟
yorumlamak/≟
yoğurtlamak/≟
yoşumak/≟
yudumlamak/≟
yumak/≟⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
yumruklamak/≟
yumurtlamak/≟
yumuşamak/≟
yurdulamak/≟
yurtsamak/≟
yuvgulamak/≟
zonklamak/≟
zorlamak/≟
çakozlamak/≟
çamurlamak/≟
çapullamak/≟
çimentolamak/≟
çinkolamak/≟
çocuklamak/≟
çokramak/≟
çoksamak/≟
çomak/≟⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
çoğullamak/≟
çoğumsamak/≟
çubuklamak/≟
çullamak/≟
öndamak/≟
şavullamak/≟
şorlamak/≟
şuruplamak/≟
şutlamak/≟
